Illinois, session 104th, HB2510.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 16-55 and 16-95 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/16-55)7    Sec. 16-55. Complaints. 8    (a) On written complaint that any property is overassessed 9or underassessed, the board shall review the assessment, and 10correct it, as appears to be just, but in no case shall the 11property be assessed at a higher percentage of fair cash value 12than other property in the assessment district prior to 13equalization by the board or the Department. 14    (b) The board shall include compulsory sales in reviewing 15and correcting assessments, including, but not limited to, 16those compulsory sales submitted by the complainant, if the 17board determines that those sales reflect the same property 18characteristics and condition as those originally used to make 19the assessment. The board shall also consider whether the 20compulsory sale would otherwise be considered an arm's length 21transaction. 22    (c) If a complaint is filed by an attorney on behalf of a 23complainant, all notices and correspondence from the board   HB2510- 2 -LRB104 08397 HLH 18448 b1relating to the appeal shall be directed to the attorney. The 2board may require proof of the attorney's authority to 3represent the taxpayer. If the attorney fails to provide proof 4of authority within the compliance period granted by the board 5pursuant to subsection (d), the board may dismiss the 6complaint. The Board shall send, electronically or by mail, 7notice of the dismissal to the attorney and complainant. 8    (d) A complaint to affect the assessment for the current 9year shall be filed on or before 30 calendar days after the 10date of publication of the assessment list under Section 1112-10. Upon receipt of a written complaint that is timely 12filed under this Section, the board of review shall docket the 13complaint. If the complaint does not comply with the board of 14review rules adopted under Section 9-5 entitling the 15complainant to a hearing, the board shall send, electronically 16or by mail, notification acknowledging receipt of the 17complaint. The notification must identify which rules have not 18been complied with and provide the complainant with not less 19than 10 business days to bring the complaint into compliance 20with those rules. If the complainant complies with the board 21of review rules either upon the initial filing of a complaint 22or within the time as extended by the board of review for 23compliance, then the board of review shall send, 24electronically or by mail, a notice of hearing and the board 25shall hear the complaint and shall issue and send, 26electronically or by mail, a decision upon resolution. Except   HB2510- 3 -LRB104 08397 HLH 18448 b1as otherwise provided in subsection (c), if the complainant 2has not complied with the rules within the time as extended by 3the board of review, the board shall nonetheless issue and 4send a decision. The board of review may adopt rules allowing 5any party to attend and participate in a hearing by telephone 6or electronically. 7    (d-5) Complaints and other written correspondence sent by 8the United States mail shall be considered filed as of the 9postmark date in accordance with Section 1.25 of the Statute 10on Statutes. Complaints and other written correspondence sent 11by a delivery service other than the United States Postal 12System shall be considered as filed as of the date sent as 13indicated by the shipper's tracking label. If allowed by board 14of review rule, complaints and other written correspondence 15transmitted electronically shall be considered filed as of the 16date received. 17    (e) The board may also, at any time before its revision of 18the assessments is completed in every year, increase, reduce 19or otherwise adjust the assessment of any property, making 20changes in the valuation as may be just, and shall have full 21power over the assessment of any person and may do anything in 22regard thereto that it may deem necessary to make a just 23assessment, but the property shall not be assessed at a higher 24percentage of fair cash value than the assessed valuation of 25other property in the assessment district prior to 26equalization by the board or the Department.   HB2510- 4 -LRB104 08397 HLH 18448 b1    (f) No assessment shall be increased until the person to 2be affected has been notified and given an opportunity to be 3heard, except as provided below. 4    (g) Before making any reduction in assessments of its own 5motion, the board of review shall give notice to the assessor 6or chief county assessment officer who certified the 7assessment, and give the assessor or chief county assessment 8officer an opportunity to be heard thereon. 9    (h) All complaints of errors in assessments of property 10shall be in writing, and shall be filed by the complaining 11party with the board of review, in the number of copies 12required by board of review rule. A copy shall be filed by the 13board of review with the assessor or chief county assessment 14officer who certified the assessment. 15    (i) In all cases where a change in assessed valuation of 16$100,000 or more is sought, the board of review shall also 17serve a copy of the petition on all taxing districts as shown 18on the last available tax bill at least 90 14 days prior to the 19hearing on the complaint. Service may be by electronic means 20if the taxing district consents to electronic service and 21provides the board of review with a valid e-mail address for 22the purpose of receiving service. All taxing districts shall 23have an opportunity to be heard on the complaint. A taxing 24district wishing to intervene shall file a request to 25intervene with the board of review at least five days in 26advance of a scheduled hearing. If board of review rules   HB2510- 5 -LRB104 08397 HLH 18448 b1require the appellant to submit evidence in advance of a 2hearing, then any evidence in support of the intervenor's 3opinion of assessed value must be submitted to the board of 4review and complainant no later than five calendar days prior 5to the hearing. Service shall be made as set forth in 6subsection (d-5), but if board of review rules allow 7complaints and correspondence to be transmitted 8electronically, then the intervenor's evidence shall be 9transmitted electronically. 10    (i-5) If board of review rules require the appellant to 11submit evidence in advance of a hearing, then any evidence to 12support the assessor's opinion of assessed value must be 13submitted to the board of review and the complainant (or, if 14represented by an attorney, to the attorney) no later than 15five calendar days prior to the hearing. Service shall be made 16as set forth in subsection (d-5), but if board of review rules 17allow complaints and correspondence to be transmitted 18electronically, then the assessor's evidence shall be 19transmitted electronically. 20    (j) Complaints shall be classified by townships or taxing 21districts by the clerk of the board of review. All classes of 22complaints shall be docketed numerically, each in its own 23class, in the order in which they are presented, in books kept 24for that purpose, which books shall be open to public 25inspection. Complaints shall be considered by townships or 26taxing districts until all complaints have been heard and   HB2510- 6 -LRB104 08397 HLH 18448 b1passed upon by the board.2(Source: P.A. 98-322, eff. 8-12-13; 99-98, eff. 1-1-16; 399-579, eff. 7-15-16.) 4    (35 ILCS 200/16-95)5    Sec. 16-95. Powers and duties of board of appeals or 6review; complaints. In counties with 3,000,000 or more 7inhabitants, until the first Monday in December 1998, the 8board of appeals in any year shall, on complaint that any 9property is overassessed or underassessed, or is exempt, 10review and order the assessment corrected.11    Beginning the first Monday in December 1998 and 12thereafter, in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 13the board of review: 14        (1) shall, on written complaint of any taxpayer or any 15    taxing district that has an interest in the assessment 16    that any property is overassessed, underassessed, or 17    exempt, review the assessment and confirm, revise, 18    correct, alter, or modify the assessment, as appears to be 19    just; and 20        (2) may, upon written motion of any one or more 21    members of the board that is made on or before the dates 22    specified in notices given under Section 16-110 for each 23    township and upon good cause shown, revise, correct, 24    alter, or modify any assessment (or part of an assessment) 25    of real property regardless of whether the taxpayer or   HB2510- 7 -LRB104 08397 HLH 18448 b1    owner of the property has filed a complaint with the 2    board; and3        (3) shall, after the effective date of this amendatory 4    Act of the 96th General Assembly, pursuant to the 5    provisions of Sections 9-260, 9-265, 2-270, 16-135, and 6    16-140, review any omitted assessment proposed by the 7    county assessor and confirm, revise, correct, alter, or 8    modify the proposed assessment, as appears to be just. 9    No assessment may be changed by the board on its own motion 10until the taxpayer in whose name the property is assessed and 11the chief county assessment officer who certified the 12assessment have been notified and given an opportunity to be 13heard thereon. 14    All taxing districts shall have an opportunity to be heard 15on the matter. The board of review shall also serve a copy of 16the petition on each taxing district in which the property is 17located, as shown on the last available tax bill, at least 90 18days prior to the hearing on the complaint. 19(Source: P.A. 96-1553, eff. 3-10-11.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.